Massachusetts, session 194th, S920.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the associate degree program
in the Stockbridge School of Agriculture at the University of Massachusetts at Amherst shall be
included in the program established under section 5B of chapter 15A of the general laws.
of 1